Washington statutes.
RCW 19.148.010

Finding—Purpose.

The ability of individuals to obtain information relating to their residential mortgage loans is vital to the financial needs of mortgagors in Washington. The public interest is adversely affected when a residential mortgage loan's servicing is sold or transferred with insufficient notification given to the mortgagor. In addition, mortgagors may experience difficulty in obtaining various mortgage loan information including information concerning mortgage loan prepayments, reserve accounts, and adjustments to monthly payments. The legislature finds that the legitimate interests of mortgagors and mortgage loan servicers are served if the disclosure of the potential sale of loan servicing is made to the mortgagor, reasonable notification of a residential mortgage loan servicing's sale is made, and continued mortgagor access to information regarding the mortgage loan is promoted.

[ 1989 c 98 s 1.]